Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5894.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8831. (1) A civil fine which that is ordered under section 8827 for a violation of state statute shall must be exclusively applied to the support of public libraries and county law libraries in the same manner as is provided by law for penal fines assessed and collected for violation of a penal law of the state. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to an increase of the amount of a state civil infraction authorized under section 401 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.401. (3) (2) Subsection (1) is intended to maintain a source of revenue for public libraries, which previously received penal fines for misdemeanor violations of state statute which statutes that are now designated state civil infractions. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5893 (request no. H00584'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.